Hawaii statutes.
[§658G-14] Appropriateness of
collaborative law process. Before a prospective party signs a
collaborative law participation agreement, a prospective collaborative lawyer
shall:

(1) Assess with the prospective party factors the
lawyer reasonably believes relate to whether a collaborative law process is
appropriate for the prospective party's matter;

(2) Provide the prospective party with information
that the lawyer reasonably believes is sufficient for the party to make an
informed decision about the material benefits and risks of a collaborative law
process as compared to the material benefits and risks of other reasonably
available alternatives for resolving the proposed collaborative matter, such as
litigation, mediation, arbitration, or expert evaluation; and

(3) Advise the prospective party that:

(A) After signing an agreement if a party
initiates a proceeding or seeks tribunal intervention in a pending proceeding
related to the collaborative matter, the collaborative law process terminates;

(B) Participation in a collaborative law
process is voluntary and any party has the right to terminate unilaterally a
collaborative law process with or without cause; and

(C) The collaborative lawyer and any lawyer
in a law firm with which the collaborative lawyer is associated may not appear
before a tribunal to represent a party in a proceeding related to the
collaborative matter, except as authorized by section 658G-9(c), 658G-10(b), or
658G-11(b). [L 2012, c 207, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next